test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njamma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - njamma: # a-stems # pelikukkodâh merkkejum stuorrâ puustuváin. 
    njamma+N+Sg+Nom: njamma
    njamma+N+Sg+Gen: njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Acc: njama
    njamma+N+Sg+Ill: njaaman
    njamma+N+Sg+Loc: njammaast
    njamma+N+Sg+Com: njammain
    njamma+N+Ess: njamman
    njamma+N+Par: njammad
    njamma+N+Pl+Nom: njamah
    njamma+N+Pl+Gen: njamai
    njamma+N+Pl+Acc: njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Ill: njammaid
    njamma+N+Pl+Loc: njammain
    njamma+N+Pl+Com: njamaijguin
    njamma+N+Pl+Abe: njamaittáá
